dev/verb/verb.bn.dix
    <pardef n="বের/া__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিলাম</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ালে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pcnd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়ে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppst"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ালি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ান</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে থাকব</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াব</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিল</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিলাম</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ান</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ালে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াস</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াই</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিলি</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ালেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ানো</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>া</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াত</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিস</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াও</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিলেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছিলে</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াচ্ছ</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছিস</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াক</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িয়েছেন</l>
          <r>া<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>

    <e lm="বেরা"><i>বের</i><par n="বের/া__vblex"/></e>
